apertium-is-sv.sv.dix
<pardef n="blin/d__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>da</l>        <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="dubb/el__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>el</l>        <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>elt</l>       <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>le</l>        <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>la</l>        <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>la</l>        <r>el<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="extra__adj">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="sp"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="frejda/d__adj"> <!-- ENTRIES COMMENTED OUT PENDING CHECKING -->
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>de</l>        <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>d</l>         <r>d<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/många__adj">
  <e>       <p><l>många</l>     <r>många<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>många</l>     <r>många<s n="adj"/><s n="pst"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>fler</l>      <r>många<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>flera</l>     <r>många<s n="adj"/><s n="comp"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>flest</l>     <r>många<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>flesta</l>    <r>många<s n="adj"/><s n="sup"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>




    <!-- Nouns -->

<pardef n="bil__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ar / ~arna -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ar</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>arna</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="äpple__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~t / ~n / ~na -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="bi__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~n / ~na -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>na</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="anhörig__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~n / ~na -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>e</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="alfabet__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~en; invariable indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="badhus__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~en; indefinite genitive in ~ø -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ackord__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~en ; invariant in indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ög/a__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~en ; invariant in indefinite -->
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>at</l>          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>on</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>onen</l>        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="chips__n"> <!-- Neuter; # / # / ~ / ~en; Only plural -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="un"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="blind"><i>blin</i><par n="blin/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="beroende på"><i>beroende</i><par n="extra__adj"/><p><l><b/>på</l><r><g><b/>på</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="enkel"><i>enk</i><par n="dubb/el__adj"/></e>
<e lm="grundläggande"><i>grundläggande</i><par n="extra__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ovannämnd"><i>ovannämn</i><par n="blin/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="hård"><i>hår</i><par n="blin/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="världsledande"><i>världsledande</i><par n="extra__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vald"><i>val</i><par n="blin/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ledande"><i>ledande</i><par n="extra__adj"/></e>
<e lm="många"><i></i><par n="/många__adj"/></e>
<e lm="kapabel"><i>kapab</i><par n="dubb/el__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sammanlagd"><i>sammanlag</i><par n="blin/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sammanhängande"><i>sammanhängande</i><par n="extra__adj"/></e>
<e lm="flexibel"><i>flexib</i><par n="dubb/el__adj"/></e>
<e lm="redo"><i>redo</i><par n="extra__adj"/></e>
<e lm="dubbel"><i>dubb</i><par n="dubb/el__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vild"><i>vil</i><par n="blin/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="acceptabel"><i>acceptab</i><par n="dubb/el__adj"/></e>
<e lm="överhängande"><i>överhängande</i><par n="extra__adj"/></e>
<e lm="avskyvärd"><i>avskyvär</i><par n="blin/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="oacceptabel"><i>oacceptab</i><par n="dubb/el__adj"/></e>
<e lm="ansträngd"><i>ansträng</i><par n="blin/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="utrikes"><i>utrikes</i><par n="extra__adj"/></e>
<e lm="fly"><i>fly</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="öga"><i>ög</i><par n="ög/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="slutförande"><i>slutförande</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="självstyre"><i>självstyre</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="hälft"><i>hälft</i><par n="bil__n"/></e>
<e lm="koncept"><i>koncept</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="levnadsvillkor"><i>levnadsvillkor</i><par n="ackord__n"/></e>
<e lm="märke"><i>märke</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="procent"><i>procent</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="motstycke"><i>motstycke</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="anställd"><i>anställd</i><par n="anhörig__n"/></e>
<e lm="ratificering"><i>ratificering</i><par n="bil__n"/></e>
<e lm="sakkunnig"><i>sakkunnig</i><par n="anhörig__n"/></e>
<e lm="bevis"><i>bevis</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="förtroende"><i>förtroende</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="visum"><i>visum</i><par n="ackord__n"/></e>
<e lm="anhörig"><i>anhörig</i><par n="anhörig__n"/></e>
<e lm="misslyckande"><i>misslyckande</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="dubbel">          <i>dubb</i><par n="dubb/el__adj"/></e>
<e lm="vredgad">         <i>vredga</i><par n="frejda/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="frejdad">         <i>frejda</i><par n="frejda/d__adj"/></e>
<e lm="många">           <i></i><par n="/många__adj"/></e>
<e lm="väg">             <i>väg</i><par n="bil__n"/></e>
<e lm="satsning">        <i>satsning</i><par n="bil__n"/></e>
<e lm="beväring">        <i>beväring</i><par n="bil__n"/></e>
<e lm="förteckning">     <i>förteckning</i><par n="bil__n"/></e>
<e lm="passning">        <i>passning</i><par n="bil__n"/></e>
<e lm="vård">            <i>vård</i><par n="bil__n"/></e>
<e lm="alfabet">         <i>alfabet</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="procent">         <i>procent</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="barn">            <i>barn</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="däck">            <i>däck</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
<e lm="ax">              <i>ax</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="besked">          <i>besked</i><par n="ackord__n"/></e>
<e lm="chips">           <i>chips</i><par n="chips__n"/></e>
<e lm="höns">            <i>höns</i><par n="chips__n"/></e>
<e lm="dödsbo">          <i>dödsbo</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="egnahemshus">     <i>egnahemshus</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="fly">             <i>fly</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="folkmord">        <i>folkmord</i><par n="ackord__n"/></e>
<e lm="frö">             <i>frö</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="gods">            <i>gods</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="inlopp">          <i>inlopp</i><par n="ackord__n"/></e>
<e lm="lokomotiv">       <i>lokomotiv</i><par n="ackord__n"/></e>
<e lm="manus">           <i>manus</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="rus">             <i>rus</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="skrå">            <i>skrå</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="småföretag">      <i>småföretag</i><par n="ackord__n"/></e>
<e lm="virus">           <i>virus</i><par n="badhus__n"/></e>
<e lm="bi">              <i>bi</i><par n="bi__n"/></e>
<e lm="bränsle">         <i>bränsle</i><par n="äpple__n"/></e>
<e lm="kvarter">         <i>kvarter</i><par n="alfabet__n"/></e>
